Missouri, session 2026, HB1791.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.492, to read as follows:
67.492. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Level 1 building permit", a permit to perform construction, maintenance,
repairs, or replacements related to the following categories on a building structure with
less than seven thousand five hundred square feet that is a residential unit, whether a
single-family residential unit or a single-family residential dwelling:
(a) An accessory structure;
(b) Alarms;
(c) Electrical;
(d) Irrigation;
(e) Landscaping;
(f) Mechanical;
(g) Plumbing; or
(h) Roofing;
(2) "Level 2 building permit", a permit to perform construction, maintenance,
repairs, or replacements related to the following categories on a building structure with
at least seven thousand five hundred square feet that is a residential unit, whether a
single-family residential unit or a single-family residential dwelling:
(a) An accessory structure;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1791 2
(b) Alarms;
(c) Electrical;
(d) Irrigation;
(e) Landscaping;
(f) Mechanical;
(g) Plumbing; or
(h) Roofing;
(3) "Level 3 building permit", a permit to perform construction, maintenance,
repairs, or replacements related to signs or nonresidential buildings with less than
twenty-five thousand square feet;
(4) "Level 4 building permit", a permit to perform construction, maintenance,
repairs, or replacements related to the following categories:
(a) Multifamily residential property not exceeding fifty units;
(b) Site-plan approvals and subdivision plats not requiring a public hearing or
public notice; or
(c) Lot grading and site alteration;
(5) "Level 5 building permit", a site-specific building permit obtained under a
building permit intended for use by builders who expect to construct identical single-
family or two-family dwellings or townhomes on a repetitive basis;
(6) "Level 6 building permit", a single-family residential dwelling permit
applied for by a contractor licensed in this state on behalf of a property owner who
participates in a federal Community Development Block Grant disaster recovery
(CDBG-DR) appropriation within this state.
2. (1) A political subdivision with authority to grant a building permit under
state law or local orders or ordinances shall approve, approve with conditions, or deny a
building permit application within the following deadlines after receipt of a completed
and sufficient application:
(a) For a level 1 building permit, thirty business days;
(b) For a level 2, level 3, or level 4 building permit, sixty business days;
(c) For a level 5 building permit, twelve business days; and
(d) For a level 6 building permit, ten business days, unless the permit application
fails to satisfy state law or local orders or ordinances relating to single-family residential
dwelling construction, maintenance, repairs, or replacements.
(2) A deadline listed in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply if the
building permit applicant waives the deadline in writing.

HCS HB 1791 3
(3) No political subdivision shall require the waiver of the deadlines in this
subsection as a condition precedent to reviewing an applicant's building permit
application.
3. A political subdivision shall meet the deadlines described in this section for
reviewing building permit applications unless the deadlines set by local orders or
ordinances are more stringent than the deadlines required in this section.
4. (1) After a building permit applicant submits an application to a political
subdivision, the political subdivision shall provide written notice to the applicant within
five business days after receipt of the application advising the applicant what
information, if any, is needed to deem or determine that the application is properly
completed in compliance with the filing requirements published by the political
subdivision.
(2) If the political subdivision does not provide timely written notice that the
applicant has not submitted the properly completed application, the application shall be
automatically deemed or determined to be properly completed and accepted.
5. A political subdivision shall maintain on the political subdivision's website a
policy containing procedures and expectations for expedited processing of building
permits and development orders required by law to be expedited.
6. (1) If a political subdivision fails to meet a deadline established under this
section, the political subdivision shall reduce the building permit fee by ten percent for
each business day that the political subdivision fails to meet the deadline.
(2) Each ten-percent reduction shall be based on the original amount of the
building permit fee.
(3) No reduction of the fee shall occur under subdivision (1) of this subsection if:
(a) The political subdivision and the building permit applicant agree, in writing,
to a reasonable extension of time; or
(b) The delay is caused by the applicant.
(4) (a) No political subdivision shall be required to reduce the building permit
fee if the political subdivision provides written notice to the applicant by email or United
States Postal Service within the respective deadlines established under this section that
specifically states the reasons the permit application fails to satisfy state law or local
orders or ordinances.
(b) The written notice shall state that the applicant has ten business days after
receiving the written notice to submit revisions to correct the permit application and
that failure to correct the application within ten business days will result in a denial of
the application.

HCS HB 1791 4
(c) If the applicant submits revisions within ten business days after receiving the
written notice, the political subdivision shall have ten business days after receiving the
revisions to approve or deny the building permit unless the applicant agrees, in writing,
to a longer period.
(d) If the political subdivision fails to issue or deny the building permit within
ten business days after receiving the revisions, the political subdivision shall reduce the
building permit fee by twenty percent for each business day that the political
subdivision fails to meet the deadline unless the applicant agrees, in writing, to a longer
period.
7. If a political subdivision refunds a building permit fee under this section, the
100 political subdivision shall recalculate any surcharge related to the permit and fee
101 collected by the political subdivision. The recalculation shall be based on the amount of
102 the building permit fees after the refund.
103 8. (1) As used in this subsection, "rebuilding area" means an area that has been
104 destroyed by a natural disaster that results in the governor proclaiming a state of
105 emergency for such area as provided in chapter 44.
106 (2) If a contractor is performing construction, maintenance, repairs, or
107 replacements in a rebuilding area and such construction, maintenance, repairs, or
108 replacements would require any level of building permit defined in subsection 1 of this
109 section, the contractor may begin such construction, maintenance, repairs, or
110 replacements in such rebuilding area without a permit as required under this section,
111 provided that the contractor shall apply for the required building permit no later than
112 thirty days after beginning such work.
113 (3) This subsection shall not be construed to exempt such construction,
114 maintenance, repairs, or replacements in a rebuilding area from any other existing state
115 law or rule or a local order or ordinance related to safety requirements for such
116 construction, maintenance, repairs, or replacements.
✔